Utah statutes.
32A-4a-503 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Enforcement of Nuisance Licensee Act.
Chapter 15a, Nuisance Licensee Act, applies to a resort license only if three
or more of the sublicenses of the resort license have not been renewed under
Chapter 15a, Nuisance Licensee Act, within three years from the day on which a
resort licensee applies for the renewal of its resort license.
